test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_saami_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - täsni: # ok  i/á
    täsni+N+Sg+Nom:   täsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Gen:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Acc:   tääsni
    täsni+N+Sg+Ill:   táásnán
    täsni+N+Sg+Loc:   tääsnist
    täsni+N+Sg+Com:   tasnijn
    täsni+N+Sg+Abe:   täˊsnittáá
    täsni+N+Ess:      täsnin
    täsni+N+Par:      täsnid
    täsni+N+Pl+Nom:   tääsnih
    täsni+N+Pl+Gen:  [taasnij, taˊsnij]
    täsni+N+Pl+Acc:   taasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Ill:   tasnijd
    täsni+N+Pl+Loc:   taasnijn
    täsni+N+Pl+Com:   taˊsnijguin
    täsni+N+Pl+Abe:   taˊsnijttáá

  Noun - säämi: # i-stems # ok
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: sääṃi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sááṃán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: säˊmittáá
    säämi+N+Ess:    säämmin
    säämi+N+Par:    säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: [saamij, saˊmij]
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: saˊmijguin
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: saˊmijttáá

  Noun - äšši: # ok CAACI
    äšši+N+Sg+Nom:   äšši
    äšši+N+Sg+Gen:   ääṣ̌i
    äšši+N+Sg+Acc:   ääṣ̌i
    äšši+N+Sg+Ill:   ááṣ̌án
    äšši+N+Sg+Loc:   ääṣ̌ist
    äšši+N+Sg+Com:   aššijn
    äšši+N+Sg+Abe:   äˊṣ̌ittáá
    äšši+N+Ess:      äššin
    äšši+N+Par:      äššid
    äšši+N+Pl+Nom:   ääṣ̌ih
    äšši+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaṣ̌ij, aˊṣ̌ij]
    äšši+N+Pl+Acc:   aaṣ̌ijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Ill:   aššijd
    äšši+N+Pl+Loc:   aaṣ̌ijn
    äšši+N+Pl+Com:   aˊšijguin
    äšši+N+Pl+Abe:   aˊšijttáá

  Noun - čääci: # ok CAACI
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Acc:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäˊsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Par:      čääccid
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, čaˊsij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   čaˊsijguin
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   čaˊsijittáá


  Noun - njäähi: # ok 
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njääṿi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Acc:   njääṿi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njääṿist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njäˊṿittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Par:      njäähhid
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njääṿih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaaṿij, njaˊṿij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaaṿijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaaṿijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   njaˊvijguin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njaˊvijttáá
